Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1316
Health carrier; cost.

The health carrier against
which a request for a standard external review or an expedited external review
is filed shall pay the cost of the independent review organization for conducting
the external review.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 16.